Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.325

Undetectable or untraceable firearms—Penalties.

(1) No person may knowingly or recklessly allow, facilitate, aid, or abet the manufacture or assembly of an undetectable firearm or untraceable firearm by a person who: (a) Is ineligible under state or federal law to possess a firearm; or (b) has signed a valid voluntary waiver of firearm rights that has not been revoked under RCW 9.41.350. For purposes of this provision, the failure to conduct a background check as provided in RCW 9.41.113 shall be prima facie evidence of recklessness.

(2)(a) Any person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) If a person previously has been found guilty under this section, then the person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW for each subsequent knowing violation of this section. A person is guilty of a separate offense for each and every firearm to which this section applies.

[ 2019 c 243 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 243: See note following RCW 9.41.010.